Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
CHAPTER 39G Kentucky Office of Homeland Security

39G.010.
Kentucky office of Homeland Security executive director — Duties — Delegation of duties — Commonwealth Activity Taxonomy System Committee — Notification of disaster or emergency.

The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall be attached to the Office of the Governor and shall be headed by an executive director appointed by the Governor.

The executive director shall:

Publicize the findings of the General Assembly stressing the dependence on Almighty God as being vital to the security of the Commonwealth by including the provisions of KRS 39A.285(3) in its agency training and educational materials. The executive director shall also be responsible for prominently displaying a permanent plaque at the entrance to the state’s Emergency Operations Center stating the text of KRS 39A.285(3);

Establish and chair an interagency working group composed of the chair of the Senate Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection Committee, the chair of the House of Representatives Seniors, Military Affairs, and Public Safety Committee, state agency representation, and private agency representation. The working group shall have the purpose of identifying risks and needs and making a complete assessment of the preparedness of the Commonwealth to respond to acts of war or terrorism, including nuclear, biological, chemical, electromagnetic pulse, agro-, eco-, or cyber-terrorism;

Serve as the State Appointed Administrator for the United States Department of Homeland Security;

Implement all homeland security presidential and gubernatorial directives, including directives pertaining to state and local compliance with the National Incident Management System;

Coordinate the efforts of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security with the efforts of the federal Department of Homeland Security;

Accept and allocate any homeland security funds in compliance with applicable federal and state laws and administrative regulations; and

Inform the members of the General Assembly of the process by which a public agency applies for a federal homeland security grant and shall provide the following information to the members at least ninety (90) days before an application deadline:

The application deadline;

How a public agency can obtain an application form;

How a public agency can obtain assistance in filling out an application form; and

Any other information that would be helpful to a public agency interested in applying for a federal homeland security grant.

The executive director may delegate responsibilities created under this section to another executive branch agency.

The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall:

Develop and publish a comprehensive statewide homeland security strategy that coordinates state and local efforts to detect, deter, mitigate, and respond to a terrorist incident;

Develop a comprehensive strategy addressing how state and federal funds and other assistance will be allocated within the state to purchase specialized equipment required to prevent and respond effectively and safely to terrorist incidents;

Urge the state and local governments to exceed minimum federal requirements for receiving assistance in preparing to respond to acts of war or terrorism in the hope that the Commonwealth will become a national leader in this preparation;

Provide information explaining how individuals and private organizations, including volunteer and religious organizations, can best prepare for and respond to incidents contemplated by this section and to other threatened, impending, or declared emergencies and whom to contact should they desire to volunteer help or services during such an emergency. The program shall identify and encourage these private organizations to specifically commit to provide food, shelter, personnel, equipment, materials, consultation, and advice, or other services needed to respond to these incidents;

Administer the Kentucky Intelligence Fusion Center and coordinate its operations with other federal, state, and local agencies;

Form the Commonwealth Activity Taxonomy System (CATS) Committee to develop and oversee a system of evaluating special events to determine, plan, mitigate, and respond to risks and threats to the Commonwealth.

The committee shall consist of members from no fewer than five (5) state agencies, including:

Kentucky Office of Homeland Security;

Kentucky Division of Emergency Management;

Kentucky National Guard; and

Kentucky State Police.

The committee shall establish a quantitative system to identify and rank state public events, maintain public safety, and protect public property.

Membership shall be determined by the state agencies identified in subparagraph 2. of this paragraph, and the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall appoint other members as necessary.

The committee shall elect a chair and a vice chair from its members who shall serve in those capacities for a term of two (2) years. A majority of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the purposes of conducting business.

The committee shall meet when called by the chair, or at the request of the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security; and

Promulgate any administrative regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

The adjutant general, or his or her designee, shall concurrently notify the Governor and the executive director of the Office of Homeland Security of a disaster or emergency involving homeland security. The adjutant general, or his or her designee, shall be the Governor’s primary point of contact for managing and responding to a disaster or emergency involving homeland security.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 193, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2013, ch. 32, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2019 ch. 179, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

39G.020.
Records and reporting — Education of reporting entities — Notification of available grants.

The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall identify and maintain a record of all federal homeland security funding, including grants, received in Kentucky. The record shall identify, at a minimum, the specific federal source, the amount, the specific recipient, the intended use of the funding, the actual use, and any unspent amount.

Not later than September 15 of each year, each department headed by an elected officer, as identified in KRS

12.020

I., each cabinet headed by an appointed officer, as identified in KRS

12.020

II., and each department headed by an appointed officer, as identified in KRS 12.020 III., shall submit to the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security a record of all federal homeland security funding, including grants, received during the state fiscal year starting with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005. The record shall identify, at a minimum, the specific federal source, the amount, the specific recipient, the intended use of the funding, the actual use, and any unspent amount.

Not later than August 1 of each year, each city, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, and special taxing district shall submit to its area development district a record of all federal homeland security funding, including grants, received during the state fiscal year by the city, county, urban-county, charter county, consolidated local government, special taxing district, or a public agency thereof, starting with the fiscal year ending June 30, 2005. The record shall identify, at a minimum, the specific federal source, the amount, the specific recipient, the intended use of the funding, the actual use, and any unspent amount.

Not later than August 15 of each year, each area development district shall group the records required under paragraph (b) of this subsection by county and submit them to the Department for Local Government.

Not later than September 20 of each year, the Department for Local Government shall submit the records received under paragraph (c) of this subsection to the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security.

Any funds received for the purpose of homeland security shall be monitored by the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security and subject to audit and compliance inspections as directed by the executive director.

The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security, area development districts, and the Department for Local Government shall educate entities that report under this section about their responsibilities under this section. If an entity is late in reporting under this section, the office, an area development district, or the Department for Local Government shall remind that entity of its reporting requirements under this section.

The Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall directly notify the chief executive officer of each city, county, urban-county, charter county, and consolidated local government concerning grants for homeland security projects as the grants become available.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 193, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 47, § 12, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 19, effective July 15, 2010.

39G.030.
Reports by office — Contents of reports.

Each year by November 1, the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security shall submit a written report to the Governor, the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Legislative Research Commission, and the Interim Joint Committee on Seniors, Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection. The written report shall:

Assess the Commonwealth’s preparedness to respond to acts of war or terrorism, including nuclear, biological, chemical, electromagnetic pulse, agro-, eco-, or cyber-terrorism;

Identify the priority of needs, areas of improvement, and the overall progress made with regard to the Commonwealth’s preparedness; and

Provide a record of all federal homeland security funding, including grants, gathered under KRS

39G.020

since the last annual written report, as well as any other relevant homeland security funding information gathered by the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security. The record shall identify, at a minimum, the specific federal source, the amount, the specific recipient, the intended use of the funding, the actual use of the funding, and any unspent amount.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall conduct an examination of revenues and expenditures provided under the annual written report and under KRS 39G.020(2)(c) and, if examination findings warrant, shall conduct audits. No later than January 30, the Auditor shall submit all examination and audit reports to the Senate Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection Committee and the House Seniors, Military Affairs, and Public Safety Committee.

In addition to the annual report required under this section, the executive director of the Office of Homeland Security shall provide to the Legislative Research Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue a quarterly report on the receipt and expenditure of homeland security funds since the previous quarterly report.

The report shall identify, at a minimum, the following:

Amount and specific source of any homeland security funds received;

Specific expenditures by amount, recipient, and intended or actual use; and

Balance of funds remaining in the account.

The initial quarterly report shall be submitted by October 15, 2006, and shall contain the required information on receipts and expenditures since the passage of the federal Homeland Security Act of 2002, Pub. L. No. 107-296.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 193, § 3, effective July 12, 2006.

39G.040.
Kentucky 911 Services Board attached to office.

The Kentucky 911 Services Board, created in KRS

65.7623

, shall be attached to the Office of Homeland Security for administrative purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 193, § 4, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 111, § 24, effective July 15, 2016.

39G.050.
Kentucky Intelligence Fusion Center.

The Kentucky Intelligence Fusion Center is created within the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security to improve intelligence sharing among public safety and public service agencies at the federal, state, and local levels, as well as the private sector.

The Kentucky Intelligence Fusion Center shall be a collaboration between the Kentucky Office of Homeland Security and federal, state, and local agencies, as well as the private sector, including but not limited to those with the primary purpose of law enforcement, public safety, public protection, infrastructure protection, public transit, and corrections.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 32, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.